Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.530

Practice without license—Penalties.

Unlicensed practice of a profession or operation of a business for which a license, registration, endorsement, or permit is required under this chapter, unless otherwise exempted by law, is a gross misdemeanor. Fees, fines, forfeitures, and penalties collected or assessed by a court because of a violation of this section must be remitted to the board.

[ 2002 c 86 s 222; 1994 c 17 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.